Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-510
Museums; gifts and devises; title in trust; revenue bonds; payment.

Any person may make gifts or devises of money, lands, or other property to or for the benefit of any public museum. The title to property so donated or devised may be made to and shall vest in the museum board of such museum and their successors in office, and the board shall thereby become the owners thereof in trust to the uses of the museum of the city, village, county, or township, but such museum board may pledge and use any unrestricted gifts or devises for the payment of the principal of or the interest or redemption premium on any revenue bonds issued for the benefit of such museum.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 10, p. 770;

Laws 1965, c. 316, § 3, p. 881.